Washington statutes.
RCW 43.06.410

State internship program—Governor's duties.

There is established within the office of the governor the Washington state internship program to assist students and state employees in gaining valuable experience and knowledge in various areas of state government. In administering the program, the governor shall:

(1) Consult with the secretary of state, the director of enterprise services, the commissioner of the employment security department, and representatives of labor;

(2) Encourage and assist agencies in developing intern positions;

(3) Develop and coordinate a selection process for placing individuals in intern positions. This selection process shall give due regard to the responsibilities of the state to provide equal employment opportunities;

(4) Develop and coordinate a training component of the internship program which balances the need for training and exposure to new ideas with the intern's and agency's need for on-the-job work experience;

(5) Work with institutions of higher education in developing the program, soliciting qualified applicants, and selecting participants; and

(6) Develop guidelines for compensation of the participants.

[ 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 455; 1993 c 281 s 47; 1985 c 442 s 1.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Purpose—2011 1st sp.s. c 43: See notes following RCW 43.19.003.

Effective date—1993 c 281: See note following RCW 41.06.022.

Construction—1985 c 442: "Nothing in this act shall be construed to limit the authority of state agencies to continue or establish other internship programs or positions." [ 1985 c 442 s 10.]

Severability—1985 c 442: "If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1985 c 442 s 11.]